Indiana, session 2026, HB1199.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-37-2-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as
provided in subsection (b), the gender listed on an individual's:
(1) birth certificate; and
(2) permanent record made from the birth certificate under
section 9 of this chapter;
may not be changed.
(b) The gender listed on an individual's birth certificate and the
permanent record made from the birth certificate under section 9
of this chapter may be changed only if any of the following
conditions exist:
(1) The:
(A) person filing the birth certificate; or
(B) state department recording the information;
made a typographical or clerical error concerning the
individual's gender.
2026 IN 1199—LS 6610/DI 104


(2) The individual's gender was listed as male but a medical
test demonstrates the absence of a Y chromosome in the
individual's deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA).
(3) The individual's gender was listed as female but a medical
test demonstrates the presence of a Y chromosome in the
individual's deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA).
2026 IN 1199—LS 6610/DI 104